Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1133
Juvenile; when subject to act.

In the case of a juvenile in need of court-ordered custody and treatment, a petitioner may file a petition and begin proceedings under the Developmental Disabilities Court-Ordered Custody Act within ninety days before the juvenile's eighteenth birthday. No order under the act shall be effective until the subject reaches his or her eighteenth birthday.

Laws 2005, LB 206, § 33.